California statutes. Education Code
In the event the governing board of a school district has elected to provide from the district general fund the amounts required to be paid on behalf of the district from the county school building aid fund under Section 16207, the county superintendent of schools shall order the payment to be made in the amount required from the general fund of the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16206.

In the event that the governing board of a school district determines, subject to the approval of the county superintendent of schools, that the amounts collected within the district by special taxes levied pursuant to Section 16204 or Section 16205 and credited to the district in the county school building aid fund are substantially in excess of amounts required of the district for purposes of Section 16207 for the ensuing three-year period, the county superintendent may order the payment to the district from the county school building aid fund of so much of the excess moneys that he or she may deem appropriate.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16207.

The county auditor shall, not later than the last Monday in December and the last Monday in May of each year, notify the superintendent of schools of the amount in the county school building aid fund. Thereupon the superintendent shall draw his or her order on the county auditor in favor of the Treasurer for the amount in the county school building aid fund of the county, except that the total of the orders for any year may be limited to an amount not to exceed the total of one hundred sixty dollars ($160) for each unit of average daily attendance during the next preceding fiscal year of students residing in a district other than a district maintaining the facilities. The amount shall be paid by the county treasurer and, upon order of the Controller, shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the State School Building Aid Fund. All money paid to the State School Building Aid Fund under the provisions of this section shall be available only for transfer to the General Fund under Section 16403, as amended by Section 2 of Chapter 1373 of the Statutes of 1992, and shall be credited to the repayment of the apportionment of funds to the school district maintaining the facilities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. School Housing Aid for Compensatory Education Purposes [16210. - 16215.]

16210.

Not to exceed thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) of the proceeds of the sale of bonds authorized by the State School Building Aid Bond Law of 1966 may be expended pursuant to this article as grants to assist school districts.

Allocations and grants under this article shall be made by the State Allocation Board, upon application of an eligible school district, for the purposes and projects designated by the district and approved by the Director of Compensatory Education. The purposes and projects shall be provided for pupils in any kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 9, inclusive, and for children participating in preschool programs. The Director of Compensatory Education may establish priorities for purposes of allocations and grants under this article based upon comparative needs of school districts and the urgency thereof. No interest shall be charged to a school district for an allocation or grant made under this article to the school district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16211.

Grants may be made pursuant to this article to districts which have been determined to be eligible for an apportionment under Article 5 (commencing with Section 54480) of Chapter 4 of Part 29, or districts maintaining schools for kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 6, inclusive, in areas designated pursuant to Section 54482 which have reduced the number of pupils to full-time equivalent classroom teachers in kindergarten and any of grades 1 to 6, inclusive, in those schools to a ratio of 25 to 1, or better. The grants shall be made for the purposes, and subject to the conditions, following:

For expenditure by the district in areas designated pursuant to Section 54482 for any of the following:

(a) Acquisition, by purchase or lease, and the installation and equipping of portable classrooms for classroom instructional purposes.

(b) Acquisition of land for schoolsites.

(c) Construction and equipping of permanent school buildings and facilities.

(d) Reconstruction, renovation or remodeling of existing school buildings and facilities.

(e) Any combination of the above.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16212.

In lieu of grants to districts pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 16211 for the purpose of acquisition of portable buildings or other facilities and equipment, the board may expend moneys available for grants under this article for the acquisition of portable buildings and facilities and equipment by the state, and thereafter convey the same to the eligible districts. The conveyance to eligible districts may take the form of sale, lease, outright grant, or other suitable form of conveyance, as determined by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16213.

In formulating recommendations to the board under this article, the State Department of Education, through the Director of Compensatory Education, shall be subject to standards established by rules and regulations of the State Board of Education.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16214.

For each school district which receives a grant or allocation pursuant to this article, commencing with the fiscal year next succeeding the fiscal year in which the grant or allocation was received, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the Controller shall compute an amount equal to one cent ($0.01) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of the assessed valuation of property within the district. The Controller shall, during the next fiscal year following that in which he or she makes the computation pursuant to the preceding sentence of this section, deduct the amount so computed in equal amounts from each of the February, March, April, and May installments of the apportionments made to the district from the State School Fund under Sections 41330 to 41343, inclusive, and Sections 41600 to 41972, inclusive; and, on order of the Controller, the amount so deducted shall be transferred to the State School Building Aid Fund. All money transferred to the State School Building Aid Fund under this section shall be available only for transfer to the General Fund under Section 17204, as enacted by Section 2 of Chapter 1010 of the Statutes of 1978.

The Controller shall make the computations and deductions required by this section for 30 fiscal years or until the time as the total of the amounts so deducted equal 50 percent of the amount of the grant or allocation which was made to the school district, whichever first occurs.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for each fiscal year for which a computation is made pursuant to the section, the maximum rate of school district tax for the school district for which the computation is made shall be increased by one cent ($0.01) per each one hundred dollars ($100) of the assessed value of property within the district and shall be in addition to any amount of tax otherwise authorized to be levied, and amounts raised through the levy of the tax may be used to offset any reduction in equalization aid resulting from the deductions made pursuant to this section.

The increase in the maximum school district tax provided by this section shall be deemed to be for bonded debt service or current capital construction. If the one cent ($0.01) rate of school district tax levied by the district causes the tax levied by the district for bonded debt service and for current capital construction in the same year to exceed the forty-cent ($0.40) tax amount, as that term is defined by Section 16070 or 16071, whichever is applicable, for each grade level maintained by the district, the Controller shall not make the deduction otherwise required by this section for the fiscal year.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16215.

Sections 16000 to 16006, inclusive, Sections 16009, 16018, and 16021, and Sections 16091 to 16100, inclusive, shall be applicable to the administration of this article, unless the context of this article, as determined by the board, requires otherwise.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. School Housing Aid for Districts Impacted by Seasonal Agricultural Employment [16230. - 16236.]

16230.

Not to exceed one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) of the amount of the proceeds of bonds issued under the State School Building Aid Bond Law of 1966 which are reserved pursuant to Section 17214, as enacted by Section 2 of Chapter 1010 of the Statutes of 1976, may be expended pursuant to this article.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to sanction, perpetuate or promote the racial or ethnic segregation, or the segregation by economic class, of pupils in the public schools.

The funds shall be expended by the State Allocation Board, for the acquisition of portable school and classroom buildings, and for the expenses incurred in the administration of this article.

The portable school and classroom buildings may be made available by the board, upon the recommendation of the Director of Compensatory Education, to any school district which, because of the influx for temporary periods in the school year of large numbers of persons employed in seasonal agricultural work, experiences emergency increases in school enrollments of such magnitude as to make it impossible or impractical to accommodate the additional pupils in existing school buildings and facilities available to the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16231.

The portable school and classroom buildings acquired pursuant to this article shall be made available to a school district irrespective of whether the district is otherwise in receipt of or eligible for assistance under any other provisions of this chapter.

The use of the portable school and classroom buildings may be made available to a school district by letting the same to the district free of charge, or by lease, or by conveying the same to the district under lease-purchase agreement, sale, or outright grant, as determined by the State Allocation Board upon consultation with, and the advice of, the Director of Compensatory Education. In addition the use of the portable school and classroom buildings may be made available to a school district by any of the means specified by Section 16041, as determined by the State Allocation Board upon consultation with, and the advice of, the Director of Compensatory Education.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16232.

The use of the portable school and classroom buildings under this article shall be based upon application therefor submitted by the governing board of the school district to the Director of Compensatory Education, who shall review the same, make any modifications he or she deems appropriate, and transmit the approved application to the State Allocation Board with his or her recommendations as to the action to be taken thereon.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16233.

If at any time the State Allocation Board shall determine that the need of the district for particular portable buildings which are made available to the district pursuant to this article has ceased, the board may take possession of the buildings on behalf of the state, and may dispose of the buildings to public or private parties in any manner and under any terms that it deems to be in the best interests of the state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16234.

Sections 16000 to 16006, inclusive, Sections 16009, 16018, and 16021, and Sections 16091 to 16100, inclusive, shall be applicable to the administration of this article, unless the context of this article, as determined by the board, requires otherwise.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16235.

All moneys received from the rental, lease, or sale of portable school and classroom buildings pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the State Treasury and, on order of the Controller, shall be credited to and in augmentation of the appropriation made by Section 16230.

All moneys shall be available without regard to fiscal years for repairing, renovating, installing, moving, or maintaining the buildings or for acquiring additional portable school and classroom buildings for the purposes of this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16236.

Notwithstanding any other law, the board may allocate any amount of the funds designated for purposes of this article that is in excess of the amounts needed for the administration of this article to any of the following:

(a) The Emergency School Classroom Fund for allocation by the board for any purpose authorized pursuant to that fund.

(b) The 1998 State School Facilities Fund for allocation by the board for any purpose authorized to that fund.

(c) The 2002 State School Facilities Fund for allocation by the board for any purpose authorized to that fund.

(d) The 2004 State School Facilities Fund for allocation by the board for any purpose authorized to that fund.

(e) If the voters approve the Kindergarten-University Public Education Facilities Bond Act of 2006 at the November 7, 2006, statewide general election, the 2006 State School Facilities Fund for allocation by the board for any purpose authorized to that fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 386, Sec. 8.   (SB 436)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. School Housing Aid for a Regional Occupational Center [16250. - 16253.]

16250.

Not to exceed two million four hundred twelve thousand two hundred thirty-three dollars and forty-nine cents ($2,412,233.49) of the amount of the proceeds of bonds issued under the State School Building Aid Law of 1966 may be expended pursuant to this article. The funds shall be allocated by the State Allocation Board to a joint powers board of education for the construction of a permanent campus for a newly created regional occupation center school to be located in the south bay area of Los Angeles County, having a population in excess of 1,070,000, and a potential average daily attendance in excess of 10,000 persons. Not to exceed four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) of such sum shall be allocated and expended for architectural and engineering services in connection with the construction.

Sections 16000 to 16006, inclusive, Sections 16009, 16018 and 16021, inclusive, shall be applicable to the administration of this article, unless the context of this article, as determined by the board requires otherwise.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16251.

The allocation of funds to the entity pursuant to this article shall be conditioned upon the prior approval of the proposed facilities and subject matter of the educational program by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16252.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to finance the capital expenditures involved in the construction, equipping, and establishment, to serve an area in great need of occupational preparation, of a regional occupational center school to be maintained by a Joint Powers Board of Education and entity. It is the further intent of the Legislature to improve the employment opportunities of persons residing in areas of need for the training, by providing educational programs of a nature that will serve the social and economic needs of that area. The program will also serve to upgrade the cultural and intellectual as well as the economic life of the area to be served.

The Legislature finds that the federal government has made available in the south bay area of Los Angeles County land to be used for a regional occupation center school, provided a permanent campus can be established on the land within 18 months. For this reason, it is essential that the money made available for purposes of this article be allocated to the establishment of a permanent campus for a regional occupational center school in the south bay area of Los Angeles County.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16253.

(a) Any amounts allocated and disbursed to the Joint Powers Board of Education and entity pursuant to this article shall be a loan by the state to the entity and shall be fully repaid by the entity to the state within 10 years after the date of disbursement to the entity. Interest shall be paid at a rate determined by the board. Any loan shall be repaid by the entity from proceeds of a tax under provisions of Section 52317, as amended by Section 1 of Chapter 267 of the Statutes of 1977, for sites, buildings and equipment, by a maximum tax levy of the assessed valuation of the entity not to exceed five cents ($0.05) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation in that entity.

(b) The annual repayment shall be determined by agreement between the Director of Finance and the Superintendent of Public Instruction. The tax revenue referred to in subdivision (a) above shall be transferred by the County Auditor of Los Angeles County to the General Fund of the state in accordance with established regulations and procedures.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Children’s Center Construction Law of 1968 [16260. - 16272.]

16260.

This article shall be known as the Children’s Center Construction Law of 1968.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16261.

The Legislature hereby declares that it is in the interest of the state and of the people thereof for the state to provide assistance to school districts and to county superintendents of schools for the construction of children’s center facilities. Children’s centers are of general concern and interest to all the people of the state, and the education and care of children of working parents are a joint obligation of both the state and local agencies operating children’s centers.

In enacting this article, the Legislature considers that the greatest need is to provide children’s center facilities for the education and care of children during the time the sole parent is at work making the family economically self-sufficient, or is in school or in training to gain economic self-responsibility. The Legislature recognizes the need to encourage the provision of additional children’s center facilities to permit more families to become economically self-sufficient.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16262.

The following terms, whether used or referred to in this article, have the following meanings, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

(a) “Local agency” means a school district or a county superintendent of schools operating or authorized to operate a children’s center pursuant to this chapter.

(b) “Board” means the State Allocation Board.

(c) “Project” means the purposes for which a local agency has applied for assistance. A project may include the acquisition and improvement of sites, the planning and construction of permanent facilities, and the acquisition of equipment for children’s centers.

(d) “Construction of facilities” means construction of permanent facilities which may include leased portable buildings.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16263.

This article shall be administered by the State Allocation Board. The board shall adopt any rules and regulations that it deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this article. The rules and regulations of the board shall establish a system of priorities to determine the relative necessity to establish children’s center facilities by a local agency. In establishing priorities with regard to the outlay of capital funds for the construction of new children’s centers, or with regard to the rental or leasing of facilities for new centers, the board shall give special consideration to school districts as described under subdivision (a) of Section 54425 which are also certified by the State Department of Health as containing substantial numbers of families who are recipients of aid to families with dependent children or who are former or potential recipients of the aid and who might reasonably be expected to improve their ability to be self-supporting if child care services are made available. The Department of Benefit Payments shall provide the State Department of Health with any information in its possession necessary for the administration of this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16264.

No local agency shall receive an initial allocation from any appropriation made for the purposes of this article more than an amount to be known as the local agency entitlement. This amount shall be computed as follows:

(a) Determine the percentage that the amount apportioned to the local agency in the previous fiscal year for operation purposes pursuant to Section 8380, as amended by Section __ of Chapter ___ of the Statutes of ____, bears to the total amount allocated to all local agencies under the same section.

(b) Determine the percentage that the statewide modified assessed valuation per average daily attendance for the grade level involved in the previous fiscal year bears to the assessed valuation per unit of average daily attendance of the local agency. Local agencies other than school districts shall use a percentage of 1.00.

(c) Determine the local agency eligibility factor by multiplying the percentage derived in (a) by that derived in (b).

(d) Determine the local agency entitlement by multiplying the district eligibility factor derived in (c) by the amount appropriated for this purpose.

Amounts of the appropriation initially unallocated may be allocated subsequently without regard to the limitation of the local agency entitlement. Amounts of local agency entitlement not applied for within 90 days of the notification of entitlement, and amounts approved pursuant to Section 16268 but not allocated pursuant to Section 16269, and not made available on an extended basis after one year from the date of the original approval, may also be allocated without regard to the limitation of local agency entitlement.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16265.

Any local agency operating or authorized to operate a children’s center may apply for assistance under this article to undertake one or more projects. Any local agency not operating a children’s center in the prior fiscal year shall have its eligibility and other factors determined by a method similar to that in Section 16264. Reasonable estimates may be used.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16266.

Applications for assistance under this article shall be made on forms prescribed and furnished by the board. The applications shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following data and information:

(a) An outline and general description of the project to be undertaken.

(b) An estimate of the cost of the project to be undertaken and the anticipated source of funds to complete the project.

(c) The estimated number of children to be served by the project.

(d) The waiting list of the local agency for children’s centers.

(e) The amount expended by the local agency from local sources during the past five years for the provision of children’s center facilities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16267.

Not more than 25 percent of any funds available under this article for allocation to local agencies under this article shall be allocated for the reconstruction or rehabilitation of existing children’s center facilities. Not less than 75 percent of the funds shall be allocated for the planning and construction of new permanent facilities, including acquisition and improvement of sites and acquisition of equipment for the facilities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16268.

The board shall notify a local agency when a preliminary approval of project has been given, and shall reserve from the appropriation made a sum in the amount of the approval given.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16269.

Funds allocated for a project shall be disbursed to the local agency upon certification to the Controller when the executive officer of the board has determined both of the following:

(a) All required approvals of the projects have been granted.

(b) The local agency has subsequent to the effective date of this section, committed the expenditure through the granting of a contract or the authorization of an agreement which requires the payment of funds.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16270.

In administering this article, the board shall approve the application. The executive officer of the board shall (a) prescribe and furnish application forms and (b) certify to the Controller the allocation of funds to which a local agency is eligible.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16271.

All sites, plans, and specifications of the proposed facilities shall be approved by the State Department of Education. Prior to the approval, the local agency shall certify to the State Department of Education the unavailability of adequate, alternate facilities in the area to be served by the proposed facilities. The facilities shall include but not be limited to vacant classrooms, auditoriums, multipurpose rooms, church or recreation facilities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16272.

For each one dollar ($1) of money allocated to a local agency which is expended for a project, the local agency shall expend local funds for the project in an amount which bears the same percentage to the one dollar ($1) as the modified assessed valuation per unit of the average daily attendance of the local agency bears to the statewide modified assessed valuation per average daily attendance of all local agencies. Local agencies other than school districts shall use a percentage of 1.00.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Regional Occupational Center of Kern [16280. - 16284.]

16280.

Not to exceed six million dollars ($6,000,000) of the amount of the proceeds of bonds issued under the State School Building Aid and Earthquake Reconstruction and Replacement Bond Law of 1974 shall be allocated by the State Allocation Board to the Regional Occupational Center of Kern for the construction and equipping of a new regional occupational center to be located in Kern County. The funds shall be available for allocation to the entity for a period of not more than four years from the effective date of this article and during such period the entity shall apply for the funds as are necessary to accomplish the purposes of this article. Funds shall be expended after the four-year period with respect to allocations made during the four-year period.

Only Sections 16000, 16001, 16003, 16005, and 16006, and Sections 16009, 16018, 16019, 16021, 16089, 16093, 16094, 16097, and 16099 of Article 1 (commencing with Section 16000) of this chapter shall be applicable to the administration of this article unless the context of this article as determined by the State Allocation Board requires otherwise.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16281.

The Legislature finds that the Regional Occupational Center of Kern is comprised of three school districts in Kern County and it provides vocational training in areas of social and economic need. The Legislature further finds that the entity is in need of school building facilities and the participating school districts have levied the permissive override tax authorized by Education Code Section 52317 to meet the cost of that construction. Inflation dictates that construction must begin at the earliest possible time to minimize the overall cost. The Legislature intends, therefore, in enacting this article to make available the necessary funds for immediate construction of the needed school facilities. The Legislature intends, however, that the funds shall be paid back in full with interest as provided by this article so that the taxpayers of this state shall not be required to pay for the support of the facilities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16282.

Any amounts allocated and disbursed to the Regional Occupational Center of Kern pursuant to this article shall be fully repaid with interest by the entity to the state in 20 equal annual payments commencing with the second fiscal year after the date of disbursement to the entity. Interest shall be paid at a rate determined by the State Allocation Board. Amounts allocated pursuant to this article shall be repaid by the entity from the proceeds of the tax levied by the participating school districts pursuant to Section 52317 and the payments shall be transferred by the County Auditor of Kern County to the State Treasury for the credit of the State School Building Aid Fund in accordance with established regulations and procedures.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16283.

If at the time of considering the entity’s application the State Allocation Board determines that the revenue to be received from the tax permitted by Section 52317 will be insufficient to pay the principal and interest of the loan in 20 equal annual payments, the board shall approve the application and allocate the funds therefor only upon condition that an election be called by the governing board of the entity and that two-thirds of the qualified electors of the entity voting on a proposition therefor, authorize the governing board to accept, expend and repay as provided in this article the allocation or apportionment. The election shall be called, held, and conducted in the same manner as are elections to authorize the issuance of school district bonds, except that the ballot shall contain substantially the following words:

“Shall the Governing Board of the Regional Occupational Center of Kern, for the purpose of providing permanent facilities for a regional occupational center, be authorized to accept, expend, and repay an apportionment from the State of California under and subject to the provisions of Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 16280) of Chapter 8, Part 10, Division 1, Title 1 of the Education Code, in an amount not to exceed $____. Yes__ No__”

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16284.

On or before the first day of January of each fiscal year the Controller shall determine the annual repayment due.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. School Housing Aid for a Regional Occupational Center in San Joaquin County [16300. - 16301.]

16300.

Not to exceed two million dollars ($2,000,000) of the amount of the proceeds of bonds issued under the State School Building Aid Bond Law of 1966 shall be expended pursuant to this article. The funds shall be expended under the administrative direction of the State Allocation Board in cooperation with the Board of Education of the Stockton Unified School District for the construction of a permanent campus for a newly created regional occupational center school to be located in San Joaquin County. Not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) of the sum shall be allocated and expended for architectural and engineering services in connection with the construction.

Sections 16000 to 16006, inclusive, and Sections 16009, 16018 and 16021, shall be applicable to the administration of this article, unless the context of this article, as determined by the board, requires otherwise. Except to the extent and for the purposes expressly provided herein, the provisions of other articles in this chapter shall not be applicable hereto.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16301.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to finance the capital expenditures involved in the construction, equipping, and establishment of a regional occupational center to be maintained by the Stockton Unified School District, to serve an area in great need of occupational preparation. It is the further intent of the Legislature, by this article, to improve the employment opportunities of persons residing in areas of need for the training by providing educational programs of a nature that will serve the social and economic needs of that area. The program provided will also serve to upgrade the cultural and intellectual life, as well as the economic life, of the area to be served.

(b) The governing board of any school district maintaining a high school may, pursuant to Section 52301, cooperate with the Stockton Unified School District in the establishment and maintenance of the regional occupational center.

(c) In conjunction with the regional occupational center, regional occupational programs may be established in the Stockton Unified School District and in participating school districts.

(d) The cooperation in the establishment and maintenance of a regional occupational center pursuant to subdivision (b) and the establishment and maintenance of regional occupational programs pursuant to subdivision (c), may be undertaken pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), the Stockton Unified School District has the sole duty to the state to operate and manage the regional occupational center and any regional occupational program authorized by this article.

(f) The amount computed for the Stockton Unified School District pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42233 shall be deemed to have been increased by the amount raised within the Stockton Unified School District for the support of a regional occupational center and program, except capital outlay expenditures, maintained during the 1972–73 fiscal year by the county superintendents of schools. The other computations required by Article 2 (commencing with Section 42230) of Chapter 7 of Part 24 shall be adjusted to appropriately reflect the increase. The revenue limit applicable to the county superintendent of schools shall be reduced by an amount equal to the increase in the revenue limit of the Stockton Unified School District made pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. School Housing Aid for Rehabilitation and Replacement of Structurally Inadequate School Facilities [16310. - 16344.]

16310.

Not to exceed forty million dollars ($40,000,000) of the proceeds of the sale of bonds authorized by the State School Building Aid Bond Law of 1966 may be expended pursuant to this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16311.
